dictsource/ruo_rules
// This file has UTF8 encoded
// Spelling-to-Phoneme rules for Istro-Romanian

.group a
        a        a

.group å
        å        &
        
.group â
        â        @

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        ts

.group č
        č        tS

.group ć
        ć        tS;

.group d
        d        d
        dz       dz
     _) dz (_    dz@
        dž       dZ
     _) dž (_    dZ@

.group đ
        đ        dZ;

.group e
        e        E
     X) e ($w_alt1 E:
     j) e        e
        e (j     e
     _) exe      %ekse        // filetype
?2   _) exe      %eikse       // filetype

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g

.group h
        h        h
     _) h        x

.group i
        i        i
     X) i ($w_alt1 i:
    ._) ini      %ini         // filetype

.group j
        j        j
    XA) j (_     j_      // short pause after final [j] in one-syllable words

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        l
     K) l (K     l-
       lj       lj

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n
        n (g     N
        n (k     N

        nj       n^
     _) nj (_    n^@

.group o
        o        o
     X) o ($w_alt1 o:
        ou       oU

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        k
        qu       kv
?2      qu       ku

.group r
        r        R
     A) r (A     R
     K) r (A     r*    // this phoneme expands to [@-*]
        rr       R
        r (_     R

     K) r (K     R2


.group s
        s        s

.group š
        š        S

.group t
        t        t

.group u
        u        u
     X) u ($w_alt1 u:

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        v

.group x
        x        ks

.group y
        y        j
     K) y (K     i


.group z
        z        z

.group ž
        ž        Z
